Alabama, session 2026rs, HB107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-6-354 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§32-6-354
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a distinctive license plate category is established
for motor vehicle owners who served in a component of the
United States Armed Forces and received the Combat Action
Ribbon, Combat Infantry Badge, Combat Action Badge, Combat
Medical Badge, Combat Action Medal, or Air Force Combat Action
Medal. The distinctive license plates shall be issued,
printed, and processed in the same manner as other distinctive
tags as provided in this chapter. An eligible U.S. service
member may apply to the judge of probate or other county
license plate issuing official in his or her county of
residence and present to the official one of the following as
Page 1

residence and present to the official one of the following as
HB107 Engrossed
proof of eligibility:
(1) A DD Form 214 stating that the service member
served in a combat theater and received awards or ribbons that
indicate combat experience.
(2) A copy of the certificate that accompanied the
service medal or ribbon signifying the participation of the
service member in the combat action.
(3) The Combat Action Ribbon, Combat Infantry Badge,
Combat Action Badge, Combat Medical Badge, Combat Action
Medal, or Air Force Combat Action Medal.
(b) Upon a service member presenting satisfactory proof
to the county license plate issuing official of his or her
combat experience, the service member shall be issued the
requested number of distinctive license plates upon the
payment of the regular license fee for the plates, as provided
by law, and payment of the additional fee of three dollars
($3) for each plate issued. The service member shall pay the
additional fee for each license plate issued thereafter. In
those years in which the decal is issued, the service member
shall pay the regular license fee for tags as provided by law.
The distinctive license plates shall be used only upon and for
personally owned, private passenger vehicles, including
station wagons and pickup trucks, registered in the name of
the service member applying, and when issued to the applicant
shall be used upon the vehicle for which issued in lieu of the
standard license plates normally issued for the vehicle. The
distinctive license plates authorized by this section shall be
as follows:
Page 2

as follows:
HB107 Engrossed
(1) Combat Action Ribbon designated by either:
a. United States Marine Corps, "Emblem of the United
States Marine Corps";
b. United States Navy, "Emblem of the United States
Navy"; or
c. Coast Guard, "Seal of the United States Coast
Guard."
(2) Combat Infantryman Badge designated with the U.S.
Army service mark, "Army Military service mark."
(3) Combat Action Badge designated with the U.S. Army
service mark, "Army Military service mark," or vis-a-vis the
alternate, "Combat Medical Badge".
(4) Air Force Combat Action Medal, United States Space
Force Combat Action Medal designated by either:
a. U.S. Air Force, "Emblem of the United States Air
Force"; or
b. U.S. Space Force Delta logo, "U.S. Space Force."
(c) The designation shall be placed to the left of the
plate identification number space and underneath the proper
branch insignia logo for each respective award or medal.
(d) The plate shall bear in bold print at the center
bottom of the plate under the numbering in bright white the
term "COMBAT VETERAN."
(e) The distinctive plate may not be personalized.
(f) The distinctive license plate may not be
transferred between motor vehicle owners and shall be subject
to the same provisions of law related to the transferring of
distinctive motor vehicle license plates provided in Section
Page 3

distinctive motor vehicle license plates provided in Section
HB107 Engrossed
32-6-154 or as otherwise provided by law or rule of the
Department of Revenue.
(g) Any individual who is proven to have falsely
obtained or falsely certified an individual to obtain a combat
action distinctive license plate issued under this section
shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 4

1, 2027.
HB107 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Public Safety and
Homeland Security
100
101 Read for the second time and placed ................14-Jan-26
102 on the calendar:
103 0 amendments
104
105 Read for the third time and passed ................10-Feb-26
106 as amended
107 Yeas 105
108 Nays 0
109 Abstains 0
110
111
112 John Treadwell
113 Clerk
114
Page 5